New York, session 2025-2026, A1369.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs a and b of subdivision 4 of section 3 of the 2 multiple dwelling law, as amended by chapter 516 of the laws of 1983, 3 are amended to read as follows: 4 a. Any city, town or village may make local laws, ordinances, resol- 5 utions or regulations not less restrictive than those provided in this 6 chapter and may provide for their enforcement by legal or equitable 7 actions or proceedings, or by administrative proceedings, and prescribe 8 the penalties, sanctions and remedies for violations thereof. In the 9 enforcement and administration of this chapter in a city of three 10 hundred twenty-five thousand or more persons, the penalties, sanctions 11 and remedies enacted by local law may be applied, notwithstanding their 12 inconsistency with this chapter, or the provisions of this chapter. 13 b. In a city of three hundred twenty-five thousand or more persons, 14 such local laws may authorize such actions or proceedings against the 15 owner, lessee of a whole multiple dwelling, agent or other person having 16 control of such dwelling, and any responsible party, or against the 17 dwelling in rem. Such local laws may further authorize (1) that civil or 18 administratively imposed penalties may be enforced against the person 19 liable therefor, and that in addition to the methods of enforcement for 20 judgments established in the civil practice law and rules, a lien may be 21 imposed against the premises and the rents therefrom; (2) that such 22 civil or administratively imposed penalties may be enforced against the 23 dwelling by the imposition of a lien against the rents therefrom. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03853-01-5 A. 1369 2 1 § 2. Paragraph c of subdivision 4 of section 3 of the multiple dwell- 2 ing law, as amended by chapter 516 of the laws of 1978, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 c. Such local laws may also authorize that all liens upon rents, 5 whether authorized by state or local law, may be satisfied without 6 further judicial proceedings by the collection of rents due or to become 7 due; and may further authorize that administratively imposed penalties 8 may be docketed and enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil 9 action without further judicial proceedings. 10 § 3. Section 304 of the multiple residence law is amended by adding a 11 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 12 3. In addition to the penalties imposed in subdivision one of this 13 section, any city, town or village may provide for the enforcement of 14 the provisions of this chapter or of local laws, ordinances, resolutions 15 or regulations promulgated pursuant hereto by administrative proceedings 16 and may authorize administratively imposed penalties which may be dock- 17 eted and enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action 18 without further judicial proceedings. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law and shall apply to any proceedings commenced on or 21 after such effective date.